Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2812
Risk manager, defined.

Risk manager shall mean an insurance company admitted to write insurance in Nebraska, which company shall be appointed by the director to manage the Residual Malpractice Insurance Authority.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 12.